Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 4
STATE FAIR AUTHORITY

35-65-401. Colorado state fair authority - creation - board - powers and duties - repeal.

The Colorado state fair authority, as it existed prior to June 30, 1997, is abolished. There is created the Colorado state fair authority in the department of agriculture as a division thereof. The Colorado state fair authority is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department of agriculture.

The function of the Colorado state fair authority is to direct and supervise the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition created pursuant to section 35-65-105.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

There is created the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority, which consists of thirteen members, twelve of whom are appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and one who is the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designee. Before October 31, 2022, no more than six members of the board may be affiliated with the same political party as the governor. The board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

On October 31, 2022, the governor shall appoint two board members from the state at large in accordance with subsection (3)(b) of this section. Members appointed before August 10, 2022, to represent the congressional districts and the state at large may hold office for the remainder of the term to which each member was appointed. When a member's term expires or a vacancy otherwise occurs, the governor shall appoint a new member in accordance with the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

This subsection (2)(c) is repealed, effective December 31, 2026.

The governor shall appoint the following twelve members of the board:

Two residents of the county in which the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition is held;

Two members from the state at large; and

Two residents from each of the four agricultural districts of the state, as defined in section 35-1-105 (3).

Members of the board shall be appointed for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. Appointments made to the board when the senate is not in session are temporary appointments, and the appointees shall serve on a temporary basis until the senate is in session and is able to confirm such appointments. If the senate does not confirm a temporary appointment during the next regular session, the temporary appointee's term ends and the person shall not be reappointed as a temporary appointee during the subsequent legislative interim. Each member shall hold office until the member's successor is appointed and qualified.

Of the twelve appointed members of the board:

Four must be involved in the agricultural industry;

At least three must be affiliated with each major political party for at least one year prior to appointment, as shown in the statewide voter registration system; and

At least three must be unaffiliated for at least one year prior to appointment, as shown in the statewide voter registration system.

In making appointments, the governor shall attempt to ensure that the board represents the geographic diversity of the state.

Any appointed member may be removed for cause at any time during the member's term by the governor. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor with the consent of the senate for the unexpired terms.

Members of the board shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 810, § 1, effective June 30, 1997.)

(8.5) All thirteen members of the board, including the commissioner of agriculture or his or her designee, shall be voting members of the board. The members of the board shall elect a chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary from among the membership of the board. Board action shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board.

The board shall:

Provide for the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition, subject to available appropriations by the general assembly;

Enter into any agreements with other agencies of the state government as may be necessary to provide for the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition;

Repealed.

Meet as often as necessary, but not less than once a month;

Repealed.

Accept contributions from nonstate sources for the purpose of financing and supporting the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition;

and (g) Repealed.

(h)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 810, § 1, effective June 30, 1997.)

(j) Adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.;

(k) Submit annual reports in accordance with section

35-65-406

;

(l) Perform such other duties as may be required by law.

(9.5) and (10) Repealed.

(11) (Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 810, § 1, effective June 30, 1997.)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1368, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 84:

(9)(e) and (9)(h) amended and (9)(i) added, p. 947, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 895, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 86, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(1) amended, p. 69, § 15, effective August 25.

L. 87:

(4) amended, p. 913, § 28, effective June 15; (10) amended, p. 1092, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(10) repealed, p. 1250, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(9.5) added, p. 43, § 1, effective March 20; (1) amended, p. 1544, § 139, effective June 1; (9)(e) and (9)(g) repealed, p. 1221, § 17, effective August 7.

L. 97:

(9.5) amended, p. 1, § 1, effective January 21; (9.5) amended, p. 204, § 1, effective April 7; (1) to (9), (9.5), and (11) amended and (8.5) added, pp. 810, 815, §§ 1, 3, effective June 30.

L. 99:

(9)(f) amended, p. 293, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 2004:

(9)(f) amended, p. 168, § 1, effective March 23; (9)(f.5) added, p. 1263, § 5, effective May 27.

L. 2008:

(9)(f.5) repealed, p. 866, § 5, effective January 22, 2009.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3403, § 151, effective August 10; (2), (3), (4), (5), and (8.5) amended, (SB 22-042), ch. 46, p. 224, § 1, effective August 10; (3)(c) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2989, § 101, effective August 10; (9)(c) repealed, (HB 22-1022), ch. 91, p. 429, § 2, effective August 10.

35-65-402. Retirement plans for employees of authority. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1251, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2)(c) amended, p. 627, § 47, effective July 1; (2)(c) amended, p. 1463, § 12, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 820, § 16, effective June 30.

35-65-403. Office of manager of the Colorado state fair authority - creation.

The office of manager of the Colorado state fair authority is hereby created. The commissioner of agriculture, in consultation with the board, shall appoint and employ a manager of the Colorado state fair authority. The person appointed and employed as the manager must have knowledge of livestock, agriculture, horticulture, industry, recreation, education, and scientific facilities, processes, and products of the state of Colorado and must have experience in fair management and promotion. The manager shall serve for an indefinite term, must not hold any other public office, and must devote the manager's entire time to the service of the state in the discharge of the manager's official duties. The appointment or removal of the manager is subject to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution and the statutes enacted pursuant to that section. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of manager of the Colorado state fair authority is a position in the senior executive service for purposes of section 24-50-104 (5)(c).

The manager is the chief administrative head of the Colorado state fair authority under the direction and supervision of the board; has general supervision and control of all activities, functions, and employees of the Colorado state fair authority; and shall exercise all necessary powers incident thereto. The manager shall exercise all the powers and functions of the board in the interim of its meetings and shall perform such other duties as prescribed by the board or by law. The office of manager is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Any current state fair authority employee who was previously certified under the state personnel system and who is returning to the state personnel system pursuant to this part 4, as amended by House Bill 97-1342, enacted at the first regular session of the sixty-first general assembly, shall be eligible for reinstatement.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 677, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1022), ch. 91, p. 429, § 3, effective August 10; (2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3403, § 152, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Section 4(2) of chapter 91 (HB 22-1022), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing this section applies to the appointment of any manager of the Colorado state fair authority on or after August 10, 2022.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

35-65-404. Transfer of property.

On June 30, 1997, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the Colorado state fair authority, as it existed prior to said date, are transferred to the Colorado state fair authority, created in the department of agriculture, and shall become the property thereof.

On and after June 30, 1997, whenever the Colorado state fair authority or the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority, as they existed prior to June 30, 1997, is referred to or designated by any contract or other document in connection with the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the Colorado state fair authority and the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority, created pursuant to section 35-65-401. All contracts entered into by the authority or its board prior to June 30, 1997, in connection with the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition, are hereby validated, with the Colorado state fair authority, created in the department of agriculture, succeeding to all rights and obligations under such contracts.

No suit, action, or other judicial or administrative proceeding lawfully commenced prior to June 30, 1997, or which could have been commenced prior to said date, by or against the Colorado state fair authority, its board of commissioners, or any officer thereof in such officer's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of the official's duties shall abate by reason of the abolishment of the Colorado state fair authority and its board, as they existed prior to said date, and the creation, in the department of agriculture, of the Colorado state fair authority and the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 2, effective June 30.

35-65-405. Colorado state fair authority - board of commissioners - enterprise status.

The Colorado state fair authority and the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority, created pursuant to section 35-65-401, shall constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, so long as the board retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and the Colorado state fair authority receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), C.R.S., from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this subsection (1), the authority and the board shall not be subject to any provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

For purposes of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., the records of the Colorado state fair authority and the board of commissioners of the Colorado state fair authority shall be public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), C.R.S., regardless of whether the authority and the board constitute an enterprise pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 2, effective June 30.

35-65-406. Annual reports.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the Colorado state fair authority and its board of commissioners shall submit copies of an annual report to the governor and the members of the general assembly on or before January 31 of each year or within ten business days after the legislative audit committee, or a successor committee, releases the Colorado state fair authority's financial audit, whichever is later. The report must include the following information for the fiscal year ending in the calendar year before the annual report is submitted and for the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year prepared in a comparison format and in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles:

A statement of revenues and expenses resulting from:

Operation of the annual Colorado state fair and industrial exposition events; and

Operation of events on any of the facilities at the Colorado state fair and exposition that are not annual Colorado state fair and industrial exposition events;

A statement of the financial position of the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition as of June 30 of each such fiscal year;

A statement of outstanding revenue bonds issued by the board, including evidence of compliance with applicable bond covenants;

A statement of cash flow for the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition;

A summary of attendance for the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition;

The number of annual Colorado state fair and industrial exposition events and the number of events operated on any of the facilities of the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition that were not Colorado state fair and industrial exposition events; and

A statement of revenues and expenses resulting from the operation of the annual Colorado state fair and industrial exposition for the most recent period ending September 30, including a summary of attendance.

The annual report submitted pursuant to this section shall include any recommendations for change in the statutes that the board or manager deems necessary or desirable, including but not limited to any change to part 14 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S., and the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S., necessary or desirable due to the unique nature of the Colorado state fair and industrial exposition.

The report shall be public.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 18, § 1, effective February 26.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 879, § 12, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

IP(1) amended, p. 2014, § 111, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (HB 21-1148), ch. 108, p. 431, § 1, effective September 7.

35-65-407. Warrants.

The controller is authorized to draw and the state treasurer to pay warrants upon all the funds appropriated from the Colorado state fair authority cash fund, created pursuant to section 35-65-107 (1), on the order of the board, signed by its chair and countersigned by its secretary.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 2, effective June 30.

35-65-408. Applicability of other laws.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:

Until March 1, 1998, the Colorado state fair authority shall not be subject to the provisions of part 14 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S. On and after March 1, 1998, the Colorado state fair authority shall be subject to the provisions of part 14 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S.; and

The Colorado state fair authority shall not be subject to the provisions of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 293, § 2, effective April 14, 1999.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 9, § 1, effective February 27.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 293, § 2, effective April 14.